dev/latin/apertium-mal.mal.lexc
LEXICON V-IV-ENNI
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-ENNI ; ! ""

LEXICON V-IV-ARIYUKA

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-ARIYUKA ; ! ""

LEXICON V-TV-KALI

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-KALI ; ! ""

LEXICON V-IV-KANUKA

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-KANU ; ! ""


LEXICON VBCOP-AAK

āk%<vbcop%>%<pres%>:āṇ CLIT-ITG ; ! "FIXME"
āk%<vbcop%>%<past%>:āyi CLIT-ITG ; ! "FIXME"
āk%<vbcop%>%<past%>:āyuṁ CLIT-ITG ; ! "FIXME" !debug !TODO adverb
āk%<vbcop%>%<past%>:āyiṭṭuṁ CLIT-ITG ; ! "FIXME"
āk%<vbcop%>%<pres%>%+yilla%<adv%>:alla CLIT-ITG ; ! "FIXME" 
āk%<vbcop%>%<pres%>%+yilla%<adv%>:illa CLIT-ITG ; ! "FIXME" 
āk%<vbcop%>%<fut%>:āyirikkumēā CLIT-ITG ; ! "FIXME"
āk%<vbcop%>%<past%>:āyirunnu NEG-WHEN-EVEN ; ! "FIXME"
!āk%<vbcop%>%<past%>:   NEG-WHEN-EVEN ; ! "FIXME"

LEXICON VBCOP-UNTU 

%<vbcop%>%<pres%>:ṇṭ CLIT-ITG ; ! "ṇṭ"
%<vbcop%>%<past%>:ṇṭāyirunnu CLIT-ITG ; ! "ṇṭ"

LEXICON DET-DEM

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ;

LEXICON A1 

%<adj%>: # ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>%<m%>%<sg%>:%>van‍  N3-COMMON;
%<adj%>%<subst%>%<f%>%<sg%>:%>vaḷ‍  N3-COMMON;
%<adj%>%<subst%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:%>var‍ N3-COMMON;
%<adj%>%<subst%>%<nt%>:%>ta  N3-COMMON;

LEXICON A2

%<adj%>: #;
%<adj%>:ṁ CLIT-CC;
%<adj%>:ṁ CLIT-COP; ! debug
%<adj%>%<subst%>:%>ta  N3-COMMON;
LEXICON A3

%<adj%>: #;
%<adj%>:ṁ CLIT-CC;
%<adj%>:ṁ CLIT-COP; ! debug

LEXICON A4

%<adj%>:%> CLIT-N-NOM ; ! ""

LEXICON ADV

%<adv%>: CLIT-COP ; 

LEXICON ADV2

%<adv%>: CLIT-CC ; 

LEXICON ADV3 

%<adv%>: CLIT-N-LOC-COMMON ; 

LEXICON ADV4

%<adv%>: # ; 

LEXICON PREADV

%<preadv%>: # ; 

LEXICON ADV-ITG

%<adv%>%<itg%>: CLIT-COP ; 
%<adv%>%<itg%>: CLIT-POST-EKK ;
 
LEXICON SPOST

%<spost%>: CLIT-CC ;

LEXICON SPOST1

%<spost%>:ṁ CLIT-CC ;
%<spost%>:ma CLIT-POST-EE ;

LEXICON SPOST-LOC

%<spost%>: CLIT-N-LOC ;

LEXICON CC 

%<cnjcoo%>: # ; 

LEXICON INTERJ
%<ij%>: # ;

LEXICON INTERJ-ILLA
%<ij%>: # ;
%<ij%>: # ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Miscellaneous 

enn%<quot%>:̔ennu # ; ! "ennu" ! ""
enn%<quot%>:enn CLIT-COP; ! "enn" ! "" ! Dir/LR
enn%<quot%>:ennu # ; ! "ennu" ! "" ! Dir/LR !debug
enna%<enum%>:enna # ; ! "enna" ! "" 

ennī%<enum%>:ennī # ; ! "ennee" ! "" 
mutalāya%<enum%>:mutalāya # ;
tuṭaṅṅiya%<enum%>:tuṭaṅṅiya # ;
ityādi%<enum%>:ityādi # ;


LEXICON Conjunctions 

pakṣe:pakṣe CC ; ! "pakṣe" ! "but"
pakṣē:pakṣē CC ; ! "" ! "but"
eṅkiluṁ:eṅkiluṁ CC ; ! "" ! "but"

LEXICON Postpositions 

ninn:ninn SPOST ; ! "nīnn" ! "from"
keāṇṭ:keāṇṭ SPOST ; ! "keāṇṭ" ! "with"
keāṇṭ:keāṇṭu SPOST ; ! "FIXME" ! "with" !Dir/LR
!tāḻe:tāḻe SPOST ; ! "tāḻe" ! "under" 
!kūṭe:kūṭe SPOST ; ! "FIXME" ! "with"

tam'mil:tam'mil SPOST ; ! "between"

!munnil‍:munnil‍ SPOST-LOC ; ! "munnil" ! "in front"
mumpil‍:mumpil‍ SPOST-LOC ; ! "mumpil" ! "in front"
!aṭutt:aṭutt SPOST-LOC ; ! "aṭutt" ! "near" 
!akatt:akatt SPOST-LOC ; ! "FIXME" ! "inside"
!puṟatt:puṟatt SPOST-LOC ; ! "FIXME" ! "outside"
!kūṭāte:kūṭāte SPOST; ! "apart from"
māṟi:māṟi SPOST; ! ": SPOST; ! "off"
oḻicc:oḻicc SPOST; ! "except"

!==with accusative=="
paṟṟi:paṟṟi SPOST; ! "about"
kuṟicc:kuṟicc SPOST; ! "about"
pēāle:pēāle SPOST; ! "as,like"
mump:mump SPOST; ! "before"
mun‍p:mun‍p SPOST ; ! "before" ! "debug"
pimp:pimp SPOST; ! "before"
sampandicc:sampandicc SPOST; ! "according to"
oḻicc:oḻicc SPOST; ! "except for"

!==with genitive=="
kūṭe:kūṭe SPOST; ! "with"
naṭukk:naṭukk SPOST; ! "between,amidst"
cūṟṟuṁ:cūṟṟuṁ SPOST; ! "around"
puṟakil‍:puṟakil‍ SPOST-LOC; ! "behind" ! RL
piṟakil‍:piṟakil‍ SPOST-LOC; ! "behind"
aṭiyil‍:aṭiyil‍  SPOST-LOC; ! "under"
tāḻe:tāḻe SPOST; ! "below"
arikil‍:arikil‍  SPOST-LOC; ! "beside"
puṟatt:puṟatt SPOST-LOC; ! "on"

!=with possessive/dative=="
mukaḷil‍:mukaḷil‍ SPOST-LOC; ! "above"
kuṟuke:kuṟuke SPOST; ! "across"
aṭutt:aṭutt SPOST-LOC; ! "adjacent"
etire:etire SPOST; ! "against"
iṭayil‍:iṭayil‍  SPOST-LOC; ! "between"
śēṣaṁ:śēṣa SPOST1; ! "after"
appuṟaṁ:appuṟa SPOST1; ! "beyond"
mumpē:mumpē SPOST; ! "prior to"
munnil‍:munnil‍ SPOST; ! "infront of"
uḷḷil‍:uḷḷil‍ SPOST-LOC; ! "in"
akatt:akatt SPOST-LOC ; ! "FIXME" ! "inside"

!==with dative =="
vēṇṭi:vēṇṭi SPOST; ! "for"
pakaraṁ:pakara SPOST1; ! "in place of"piṟakil:piṟakil SPOST-LOC ; ! "FIXME" ! "behind"

!==only after place ===
ninn:ninn SPOST ; ! "nīnn" ! "from"
mutal‍:mutal‍  SPOST ; ! "" ! "from"
teāṭṭ:teāṭṭ SPOST ; ! "" ! "from"
vare:vare SPOST ; ! "" ! "from"
!==with all ==
mātraṁ:mātra SPOST1; ! "" ! "only"
kūṭe:kūṭe SPOST ; ! "" ! "with"
kūṭi:kūṭi SPOST ; ! "" ! ""
tanne:tanne SPOST ; ! "" ! ""
pēāluṁ:pēāluṁ SPOST ; ! "" ! ""

LEXICON Pronouns

PRON-PERS-NNAAN ; ! "ñān" ! "I"
nī:na PRON-PERS-NII ; ! "nī" ! "you"
avan‍:avana PRON-PERS-AVAN ; ! "avan" ! "he"

ivan‍:ivana PRON-PERS-AVAN ; ! "ivan" ! "he"
avaḷ‍:avaḷa PRON-PERS-AVAL ; ! "avaḷ‍" ! "she"

ñaṅṅaḷ‍:ñaṅṅaḷa PRON-PERS-NNANNAL ; ! "ñaṅṅaḷ‍" ! "we"
nāṁ:na PRON-PERS-NAAM ; ! "nām" ! "we"

niṅṅaḷ‍:niṅṅaḷa PRON-PERS-NINNAL ; ! "niṅṅaḷ‍" ! "you"

avar‍:avara PRON-PERS-AVAR ; ! "avar" ! "they"
ivar‍:ivara PRON-PERS-AVAR ; ! "avar" ! "they"

at:a PRON-DEM-AT ; ! "at" ! "that"
it:i PRON-DEM-AT ; ! "it" ! "this"

ent:enta PRON-ITG-ENT ; ! "ent" ! "what"

enteṅkiluṁ:enteṅkiluṁ PRON-IND ; ! "FIXME" ! "anything"
onnuṁ:onnuṁ PRON-IND ; ! "onnuṁ" ! "anything" 
addēhaṁ:addēha PRON-PERS-ADDEHA ; ! "addēhaṁ" ! "he" 
iddēhaṁ:iddēha PRON-PERS-ADDEHA ; ! "iddēhaṁ" ! "this person" 

tān‍:ta PRON-REF-THAN; ! "" ! 

LEXICON Determiners

ā:ā DET-DEM ; ! "ā" ! "that"
ī:ī DET-DEM ; ! "ī" ! "this" 
maṟṟ:maṟṟ DET-DEM ; ! "" ! "other"
maṟṟ:maṟṟu DET-DEM ; ! "" ! "other" !debug
ōrēā:ōrēā DET-DEM ; ! "" ! "each" ! "distributive det"
mikka:mikka DET-DEM ; ! "' ! "most"


LEXICON Numerals

oru:o NUM-ONNU ; ! "FIXME" ! "one" 
onn:onna NUM ; ! "FIXME" ! "two" 
raṇṭ:raṇṭa NUM ; ! "FIXME" ! "two" 
raṇṭ:raṇṭu NUM ; ! "FIXME" ! "two"  ! Dir/LR
mūnn:mūnna NUM ; ! "FIXME" ! "three"
nāl:nāla NUM ; ! "FIXME" ! "four"
añc:añca NUM ; ! "FIXME" ! "five" 
āṟ:āṟa NUM ; ! "FIXME" ! "six" 
ēḻ:ēḻa NUM ; ! "FIXME" ! "seven" 
eṭṭ:eṭṭa NUM ; ! "FIXME" ! "eight"
on‍pat:on‍pata NUM ; ! "FIXME" ! "nine" 
patt:patta NUM ; ! "FIXME" ! "ten"
patineānn:patineānna NUM ; ! ""
pantraṇṭ:pantraṇṭa NUM ; ! ""
patimūnn:patimūnna NUM ; ! "" 
patināl:patināla NUM ; ! ""
patinañc:patinañca NUM ; ! ""
patināṟ:patināṟa NUM ; ! ""
patinēḻ:patinēḻa NUM ; ! ""
patineṭṭ:patineṭṭa NUM ; ! ""
patteāmpat:patteāmpata NUM ; ! ""

irupat:irupata NUM-IRUPAT; ! "" ! "twenty"
muppat:muppata NUM-IRUPAT;! "" ! "thirty"
nālpat:nālpata NUM-IRUPAT; ! "" ! "forty"
ampat‌:ampata NUM-IRUPAT ; ! "" ! "fifty"
aṟupat‌:aṟupata  NUM-IRUPAT ; ! "" ! "sixty"
eḻupat:eḻupata  NUM-IRUPAT ; ! "" ! "seventy"
eṇ‍pat:eṇ‍pata NUM-IRUPAT ; ! "" ! "eighty"
teāṇṇūr‍:teāṇṇūṟa NUM-IRUPAT ; ! "" ! "ninety"
nūṟ:nūṟa NUM-IRUPAT ; ! "" ! "one hundred"

LEXICON Adverbs
eviṭe:eviṭe ADV-ITG ; ! "eviṭe" ! "where" 
entukeāṇṭ:entukeāṇṭ ADV-ITG ; ! "" FIXME ! "why"
vaḷare:vaḷare PREADV ; ! "FIXME" ! "very"
ēṟe:ēṟe PREADV ; ! "" ! "very"
tell:tell PREADV ; ! "" ! "a somewhat"
ēṟṟavuṁ:ēṟṟavuṁ PREADV ; ! "ēṟṟavuṁ" ! "most"
kūṭutal‍:kūṭutal‍ PREADV ; ! "" ! "more"
kūṭutal‍:kūṭutal‍ ADV ; ! "" ! "more"
aviṭe:aviṭe ADV3 ; ! "FIXME" ! "there"
iviṭe:iviṭe ADV3 ; ! "FIXME" ! "there"
puṟattē:puṟattē ADV3 ; ! "FIXME" ! "outside"
vīṇṭuṁ:vīṇṭuṁ ADV ; ! "vīṇṭuṁ" ! "again"
melle:melle ADV ; ! "melle" ! "slowly"
patukke:patukke ADV; ! "pathukke" ! "slowly"
peṭṭenn:peṭṭenn  ADV ; ! "peṭṭenn" ! "suddenly"
ippēāḻuṁ:ippēāḻuṁ ADV ; ! "FIXME" ! "still" 
ippēāḷ‍:ippēāḷ‍ ADV ; ! "FIXME" ! "now"
eppēāḻuṁ:eppēāḻuṁ ADV ; ! "FIXME" ! "always"
ennuṁ:ennuṁ ADV ; ! "" ! "always"
vyaktamāyi:vyaktamāyi ADV ; ! "FIXME" ! "clearly"
orumicc:orumicc ADV2 ; ! "FIXME" ! "together"
pinne:pinne ADV2 ; ! "FIXME" ! "then"
atukeāṇṭ:atukeāṇṭ ADV2 ; ! "FIXME" ! "so"
tanne:tanne ADV ; ! "FIXME" ! "definitely"
kūṭi:kūṭi ADV ; ! "FIXME" ! "too"
puṟatt:puṟatt ADV ; ! "FIXME" ! "outside"
ellāyiṭattuṁ:ellāyiṭattuṁ ADV4 ; ! "FIXME" ! "everywhere"
tīr‍ccayāyuṁ:tīr‍ccayāyuṁ ADV4 ; ! "FIXME" ! "definitly"
aṅṅane:aṅṅane  ADV ; ! "FIXME" ! "like that"
cuṟṟuṁ:cuṟṟuṁ ADV ; ! "FIXME" !"around"
ādyaṁ:ādyaṁ ADV ; ! "" ! "first"
pinnīṭ:pinnīṭ ADV ; ! "" ! "after"
tuṭar‍nn:tuṭar‍nn ADV ; ! "" ! "after"
oṭukkaṁ:oṭukkaṁ ADV ; ! "" ! "the end"
avasānaṁ:avasānaṁ ADV ; ! "" ! "at last"
iṭaykk:iṭaykk ADV ; ! "" ! "in between"
kūṭāte:kūṭāte ADV ; ! "" ! ""
ellā:ellā ADV ; ! "" ! "all'
uṭan‍:uṭan‍ ADV ; ! "" ! "quicikly"
ugraṁ:ugraṁ ADV ; ! "" ! "strongly'
muḻuvan‍:muḻuvan‍ ADV ; ! "complete"
ētāṇṭ:ētāṇṭ ADV; ! "some what"
āke:āke  ADV; ! "" ! ""
tīr‍ttuṁ:tīr‍ttuṁ  ADV; ! "" ! ""
appāṭe:appāṭe  ADV; ! "" ! ""
ākappāṭe:ākappāṭe  ADV; ! "" ! ""
tikaccuṁ:tikaccuṁ  ADV; ! "" ! ""
oṭṭuṁ:oṭṭuṁ  ADV; ! "" ! ""
tīre:tīre  ADV; ! "" ! ""
telluṁ:telluṁ  ADV; ! "" ! ""
alpaṁ:alpaṁ  ADV; ! "" ! ""
ittiri:ittiri  ADV; ! "" ! ""
ottiri:ottiri  ADV; ! "" ! ""
orupāṭ:orupāṭ  ADV; ! "" ! ""
oṭṭu:oṭṭu  ADV; ! "" ! ""
oṭṭukke:oṭṭukke  ADV; ! "" ! ""
ēṟekuṟe:ēṟekuṟe ADV; ! "" ! ""
ēkadēṣaṁ:ēkadēṣaṁ ADV; ! "" ! ""
kuṟē:kuṟē ADV; ! "" ! ""
kuṟēyeākke:kuṟēyeākke ADV; ! "" ! ""
oṭṭumukkāluṁ:oṭṭumukkāluṁ ADV; ! "" ! ""
kūṭutaluṁ:kūṭutaluṁ ADV; ! "" ! ""
mikkavāṟuṁ:mikkavāṟuṁ ADV;
turuturā:turuturā ADV ; ! "" ! ""
veḷuveḷā:veḷuveḷā ADV ; ! "" ! ""
paḷapaḷā:paḷapaḷā ADV ; ! "" ! ""
minuminā:minuminā ADV ; ! "" ! ""
mīte:mīte ADV ; ! "" ! ""
kīḻe:kīḻe ADV ; ! "" ! ""
puṟake:puṟake ADV ; ! "" ! ""
dūre:dūre ADV ; ! "" ! ""
orikkal‍:orikkal‍ ADV ; ! "" ! ""
ann:ann ADV ; ! "" ! ""
nāḷe:nāḷe  ADV ; ! "" ! ""
miniññānn:miniññānn ADV ; ! "" ! ""
maṟṟannāḷ‍:maṟṟannāḷ‍ ADV ; ! "" ! ""
paṇṭ:paṇṭ ADV ; ! "" ! ""
palappēāḻuṁ:palappēāḻuṁ ADV ; ! "" ! ""
ennennuṁ:ennennuṁ ADV ; ! "" ! ""
talkṣaṇaṁ:talkṣaṇaṁ  ADV ; ! "" ! ""
tal‍kālaṁ:tal‍kālaṁ  ADV ; ! "" ! ""
uṭanaṭi:uṭanaṭi ADV ; ! "" ! ""
eṅkil‍:eṅkil‍ ADV ; ! "" ! ""
kūṭāte:kūṭāte ADV ; ! "" ! ""
maṟicc:maṟicc ADV ; ! "" ! ""
enniṭṭ:enniṭṭ ADV ; ! "" ! ""
enniṭṭuṁ:enniṭṭuṁ ADV ; ! "" ! ""
āyatināl‍:āyatināl‍ ADV ; ! "" ! ""
eniyuṁ:eniyuṁ ADV ; ! "" ! ""
parasparaṁ:parasparaṁ ADV ; ! "" ! ""
an'yēān'yaṁ:an'yēān'yaṁ ADV ; ! "" ! ""
nēre:nēre ADV ; ! "" ! ""
LEXICON Verbs
VBCOP-AAK ; ! "āk" ! "be"
uṇṭ:u VBCOP-UNTU ; ! "uṇṭ" ! "have"
